Massachusetts, session 194th, H5544.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
ORDERED that pursuant to Article 89, Section 8 of the Massachusetts Constitution, that
allows the legislative body of the Town of Bridgewater to vote to submit a Special Act to the
State Legislature to Amend the current Bridgewater Town Charter, the Town Council voted to
amend said Town Charter, Article VIII, Section 8-2 as follows:
Replace the existing language regarding the timeframe for submitting referendum
petitions with the following:
Citizen Referendum Procedures; Referendum Petition; Effect on Final Passage
If within 30 days after the final passage of a measure, a petition signed by voters equal in
number to at least 5 per cent of the total number of voters and addressed to the town council,
protesting against the measure or any part thereof taking effect, is filed with the elected town
of 2

clerk, the same shall thereupon and thereby be suspended from taking effect and the town
council, as the case may be, shall immediately reconsider the measure or part thereof and if such
measure or part thereof is not entirely rescinded, the town council shall submit the same, to a
vote of the voters either at the next regular town election or at a special election which may, in its
discretion, be called for the purpose and the measure or part thereof shall forthwith become null
and void unless a majority of the voters voting on the same at the election vote in favor thereof.
Said Amendment shall only become effective and is contingent upon approval by the
Town Council, the State Legislature and the voters of the Town of Bridgewater.
of 2